District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.10

Remuneration of directors.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors may set the remuneration of directors and of nondirector committee members appointed under § 29-1008.17(a).

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 810 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition

Editor's Notes